North Dakota, session 69, HB1583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-10-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-10-04. Publication of false information in political advertisements - Penalty.
1. A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if thatthe person knowingly, or with
reckless disregard for its truth or falsity, publishes anya political advertisement or news
release that contains anycontaining an assertion, representation, or statement of fact,
including information concerning a candidate's prior public record, which is untrue,
deceptive, or misleading, whether on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate for
public office, initiated measure, referred measure, constitutional amendment, or any
other issue, question, or proposal on an election ballot, and whether the publication is
published by radio, television, newspaper, pamphlet, folder, display cards, signs,
posters, billboard advertisements, websites, electronic transmission, social media, or
by any other public means or commercial medium.
2. This section does not apply to a newspaper, television or radio station, or other
commercial medium that is not the source of the political advertisement or news
release.
3. A candidate who is the subject of an untrue, deceptive, or misleading advertisement
under this section may commence a civil action to recover civil damages. A candidate
who successfully recovers civil damages under this section must be awarded the full
Page No. 1 25.0444.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
amount of all costs and attorney's fees incurred by the candidate during the pendency
of the civil proceedings.
Page No. 2 25.0444.03000